Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1718
Contracts authorized.

The commission, in accordance with the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, may solicit and execute a design-build contract or a construction manager-general contractor contract for a public project in the state park system.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 19.